Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.110

Houses of lewdness, assignation or prostitution may be abated—Voluntary abatement.

If the owner of the building in which a nuisance is found to be maintained, appears and pays all costs of the proceeding, and files a bond with sureties to be approved by the clerk in the full value of the property to be ascertained by the court, conditioned that he or she will immediately abate said nuisance and prevent the same from being established or kept therein within a period of one year thereafter, the court or judge may, if satisfied of his or her good faith, order the premises, closed under the order of abatement, to be delivered to said owner, and said order closing the building canceled. The release of the property under the provisions of this section shall not release it from any judgment, lien, penalty, or liability to which it may be subject by law.

[ 2011 c 336 s 217; 1927 c 94 s 3; 1913 c 127 s 7; RRS s 946-7.]